Missouri, session 2026, SB1295.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 116.050, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 116.050,
to read as follows:
116.050. 1. Initiative and referendum petitions filed
under the provisions of this chapter shall consist of pages
of a uniform size. Each page, excluding the text of the
measure, shall be no larger than eight and one-half by
fourteen inches. Each page of an initiative petition shall
be attached to or shall contain a full and correct text of
the proposed measure. Each page of a referendum petition
shall be attached to or shall contain a full and correct
text of the measure on which the referendum is sought.
2. The full and correct text of all initiative and
referendum petition measures shall:
(1) Contain all matter which is to be deleted included
in its proper place enclosed in brackets and all new matter
shown underlined;
(2) Include all sections of existing law or of the
constitution which would be repealed by the measure; and

SB 1295 2
(3) Otherwise conform to the provisions of Article
III, Section 28 and Article III, Section 50 of the
Constitution and those of this chapter.
3. The secretary of state shall collect an initiative
petition filing fee of one thousand dollars for each
initiative petition filed if the petition relates to a
subject on which an initiative petition has been filed by
the petitioner since the most recent general election. No
fee shall be charged if the petition is the first petition
filed by the same petitioner on a particular subject.
✓